Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Livestock Animal Welfare Act:

(1) Abandon means to leave a livestock animal in one's care,
whether as owner or custodian, for any length of time without making effective
provision for the livestock animal's feed, water, or other care
as is reasonably necessary for the livestock animal's health;

(2) Animal welfare practice means veterinarian practices and
animal husbandry practices common to the livestock animal industry, including
transport of livestock animals from one location to another;

(3) Bovine means a cow, an ox, or a bison;

(4) Cruelly mistreat means to knowingly and intentionally
kill or cause physical harm to a livestock animal in a manner that is not
consistent with animal welfare practices;

(5) Cruelly neglect means to fail to provide a livestock animal
in one's care, whether as owner or custodian, with feed, water,
or other care as is reasonably necessary for the livestock animal's health;

(6) Equine means a horse, pony, donkey, mule, or hinny;

(7) Euthanasia means the destruction of a livestock animal
by commonly accepted veterinary practices;

(8) Law enforcement officer means any member of the Nebraska
State Patrol, any county or deputy sheriff, any member of the police force
of any city or village, or any other public official authorized by a city
or village to enforce state or local laws, rules, regulations, or ordinances;

(9) Livestock animal means any bovine, equine, swine, sheep,
goats, domesticated cervine animals, ratite birds, llamas, or poultry;

(10) Owner
or custodian means any person owning, keeping, possessing, harboring, or knowingly
permitting an animal to remain on or about any premises owned or occupied
by such person; and

(11) Serious
injury or illness includes any injury or illness to any livestock animal which
creates a substantial risk of death or which causes broken bones, prolonged
impairment of health, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function of any
bodily organ.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB423, § 6.